North Dakota, session 69, HB1209.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. DEPARTMENT OF EMERGENCY SERVICES - FOREIGN ADVERSARY THREAT
ASSESSMENT - REPORT - LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT REPORT.
1. The department of emergency services shall:
a. Identify sectors and industries most vulnerable to foreign adversarial influence, including
critical infrastructure, technology, agriculture, energy, and academia;
b. Assess foreign adversarial influence beyond land acquisition, including strategic
investments, partnerships, and other forms of economic, educational, and political
influence;
c. Evaluate existing investments and activities to determine compliance with federal, state,
and local laws;
d. Identify sectors in which foreign adversarial influence is often unmonitored or under
reported; and
e. Propose broad mitigation strategies relating to identified risks and vulnerabilities to
enhance the state's ability to manage foreign adversarial influence while supporting
economic growth and security.
2. By July 1, 2026, the department of emergency services shall produce a written report outlining
its findings and recommendations. The report must:
a. Provide a detailed analysis of the foreign adversary threats and vulnerabilities specific to
the state;
b. Identify critical risks across sectors, including infrastructure, security, academia, and
economic investments;
c. Provide sector specific mitigation recommendations designed to reduce vulnerabilities in
infrastructure, academic institutions, economic investments, and other prominent sectors
in the state; and
d. Include a proposal providing for the establishment of a state intelligence unit and the
structure, roles, and operational procedures required for continuous monitoring of foreign
adversary threats by the state intelligence unit.
3. Before September 1, 2026, the department of emergency services shall present the
recommendations in the report under subsection 2, and any proposed legislation necessary to
implement the recommendations, to the legislative management. The findings in the report
must remain in the exclusive possession and under the control of the department of
emergency services and is an exempt record under chapter 44-04.

H. B. NO. 1209 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1209.
House Vote: Yeas 92 Nays 0 Absent 2
Senate Vote: Yeas 40 Nays 7 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State